Tennessee, session 114, SB2132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) All permanent rules filed in the office of secretary of state on or after January
1, 2025, that are in effect on the effective date of this act, and that are scheduled for
expiration under Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-5-226, on June 30, 2026, do not
expire on June 30, 2026, but remain in effect until repealed or amended by subsequent
rule of the appropriate rulemaking agency or until otherwise superseded by legislative
enactment.
(b) This section is not to be construed to justify the continued effectiveness of
any rule that remains in effect under subsection (a) if the rule conflicts with the
provisions of any legislative enactment other than the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5.
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act or the application of any provision of this act to
any person or circumstance is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to
that end, the provisions of this act are severable.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2132
010123
- 1 -